District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

33-209.06

Cancellation of certificate of authority.

Repealed.

Dec. 10, 1987, D.C. Law 7-49, § 906, 34 DCR 6856
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(y), 58 DCR 1720

History

1981 Ed., § 41-496.

Prior Codifications